Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202660-4,139.01
School bus endorsement; requirements.

An applicant for a school bus endorsement shall satisfy the following three requirements:

(1) Pass the knowledge and skills test for obtaining a passenger vehicle endorsement;

(2) Have knowledge covering at least the following three topics:

(a) Loading and unloading children, including the safe operation of stop signal devices, external mirror systems, flashing lights, and other warning and passenger safety devices required for school buses by state or federal law or regulation;

(b) Emergency exits and procedures for safely evacuating passengers in an emergency; and

(c) State and federal laws and regulations related to safely traversing highway-rail grade crossings; and

(3) Take a driving skills test in a school bus of the same vehicle group as the school bus the applicant will drive.

Laws 2003, LB 562, § 11;

Laws 2022, LB750, § 61.